Massachusetts, session 194th, H641.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 151C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding after clause (e) the following new clause:- “(f)
The term “special medical status” means the condition of an individual due to a disability as
defined by the Americans with Disabilities Act or due to the reception or failure to receive any
medical treatment whether preventative, curative or palliative.”
SECTION 2. Clause (a) of section 2 of chapter 151C of the General Laws, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “admission” in line 4 the following
words:- “or continued enrollment”.
SECTION 3. Clause (a) of said section 2 of said chapter 151C, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended by deleting the words “or national origin” in line 5 and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- “, national origin or special medical status”.
of 3

SECTION 4. Clause (c) of said section 2 of said chapter 151C, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by deleting the words “or national origin” in line 11 and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- “, national origin or special medical status”.
SECTION 5. Said clause (c) said section 2 of said chapter 151C, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the word “admission” in line 11 the following words:-
“or continued enrollment”.
SECTION 6. Said clause (c) of said section 2 of said chapter 151C, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by deleting the words “applicants for admissions” in line 15 and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- “such persons”.
SECTION 7. Clause (d) of said section 2 of said chapter 151C, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the words “admission to” in line 17 the following words:- “or
continued enrollment in”.
SECTION 8. Said clause (d) of said section 2 of said chapter 151C, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by deleting the words “or national origin” in line 19 and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- “, national origin or special medical status”.
SECTION 9. Said clause (d) of said section 2 of said chapter 151C, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the words “admitted to” in line 20 the following
words:- “or enrolled in”.
SECTION 10. Clause (e) of said section 2 of said chapter 151C, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “admission” in line 22 the following words:- “or
continued enrollment”.
of 3

SECTION 11. Clause (g) of said section 2 of said chapter 151C, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by deleting the words “or national origin” in line 43 and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- “, national origin or special medical status”.
of 3